tr: Tetik giriş konektörü: 1/4 inç TRS; 1/4 inç TS; 3,5 mm TRS; DB-25 (analog tetikleyici bağlantısı); Çoklu pimli/özel tesisat; USB (USB çevre birimi üzerinden tetikleme); Diğer
vi: Kết nối đầu vào kích hoạt yếu tố: TRS 1/4 inch; TS 1/4 inch; TRS 3,5 mm; DB-25 (dây chia bộ kích hoạt analog); Bộ dây điện nhiều chân/độc quyền; USB (kích hoạt qua thiết bị ngoại vi USB); Khác
ro-RO: Conector de intrare pentru declanșator: 1/4 inchi TRS; 1/4 inchi TS; 3,5 mm TRS; DB-25 (extensie trigger analogic); Cablaj multipin/proprietar; USB (trigger via periferic USB); Altele
lt-LT: Paleidiklio įvesties jungtis: 1/4 colio TRS; 1/4 colio TS; 3,5 mm TRS; DB-25 (analoginio paleidiklio perėjimas); Kelių kontaktų / nuosavybinė laidų pynė; USB (paleidiklis per USB išorinį įrenginį); Kita
de: Trigger Eingangsanschluss: 1/4-Zoll-TRS; 1/4-Zoll-TS; 3,5-mm-TRS; DB-25 (analoger Trigger-Breakout); Mehrpoliger/proprietärer Kabelbaum; USB (Trigger via USB-Peripheriegerät); Sonstige
it: Connettore di ingresso trigger: TRS da 1/4"; TS da 1/4"; TRS da 3,5 mm; DB-25 (breakout trigger analogico); Multi-pin/cablaggio proprietario; USB (trigger tramite periferica USB); Altro
nb: Inngangskobling for utløser: 1/4-tommers TRS; 1/4-tommers TS; 3,5 mm TRS; DB-25 (analog triggerutvidelse); Flerpolet/proprietært ledningsnett; USB (utløser via USB-enhet); Annet
pt-BR: Entrada de disparo conector: TRS de 1/4 pol.; TS de 1/4 pol.; TRS de 3,5 mm; DB-25 (saída de acionador analógico); Chicote elétrico multipinos/proprietário; USB (acionador por periférico USB); Outro
pl: Złącze wejścia triggera: 1/4 cala TRS; 1/4 cala TS; 3,5 mm TRS; DB-25 (kabel rozdzielający sygnały analogowe); Wielostykowe / zastrzeżona wiązka; USB (wyzwalacz przez urządzenie peryferyjne USB); Inne
nl: Triggerinput connector: 1/4 inch TRS; 1/4 inch TS; 3,5 mm TRS; DB-25 (analoge trigger-breakout); Multi-pin/eigen kabelboom; USB (trigger via USB-randapparaat); Overig
zh-TW: 觸發器輸入接頭: 1/4 吋 TRS; 1/4 吋 TS; 3.5 mm TRS; DB-25 (類比觸發分接線); 多針/專有線束; USB (透過 USB 週邊設備觸發); 其他
zh-CN: 触发输入连接器类型: 1/4 英寸 TRS; 1/4 英寸 TS; 3.5 毫米 TRS; DB-25（模拟触发器分支）; 多引脚/专有线束; USB（通过 USB 外设触发）; 其他
bg-BG: Конектор за вход на тригера: 1/4-инчов TRS; 1/4-инчов TS; 3,5 мм TRS; DB-25 (аналогов тригерен кабел); Многопинов/специфичен кабелен сноп; USB (тригер през USB периферия); Друго
sk-SK: Vstupný konektor spúšťača: 1/4-palcový TRS; 1/4-palcový TS; 3,5 mm TRS; DB-25 (analógový spúšťací rozvetvovač); Viacpinový/proprietárny zväzok; USB (spúšťač cez perifériu USB); Iné
da: Stik til triggerinput: 1/4-tommer TRS; 1/4-tommer TS; 3,5 mm TRS; DB-25 (analog udløser-breakout); Multipin/navnebeskyttet ledningsnet; USB (udløser via USB-enhed); Andet
sl-SI: Vrsta priključka za sprožilni vhod: 1/4-palčni TRS; 1/4-palčni TS; 3,5 mm TRS; DB-25 (razvodni kabel analognega sprožilca); Večpolni/lastniški snop; USB (sprožilec prek zunanje naprave USB); Drugo
sv: Anslutning för trigger-ingång: 1/4-tums TRS; 1/4-tums TS; 3,5 mm TRS; DB-25 (analog trigger-breakout); Proprietärt flerstiftskablage; USB (trigger via USB-kringutrustning); Övrigt
el: Σύνδεσμος εισόδου trigger: 1/4 ίντσας TRS; 1/4 ίντσας TS; 3,5 mm TRS; DB-25 (διακλάδωση αναλογικού στοιχείου ενεργοποίησης); Πλεξούδα πολλαπλών ακίδων/ιδιόκτητη; USB (στοιχείο ενεργοποίησης μέσω περιφερειακού USB); Άλλο
cs: Konektor spouštěcího vstupu: 1/4" TRS; 1/4" TS; 3,5mm TRS; DB-25 (rozbočovač analogového triggeru); Vícekolíkový / proprietární svazek; USB (trigger přes USB periférii); Jiné
pt-PT: Conector de entrada para acionador: TRS de 1/4 pol.; TS de 1/4 pol.; TRS de 3,5 mm; DB-25 (breakout do acionador analógico); Cablagem multipinos/proprietária; USB (acionador via periférico USB); Outro
en: Trigger input connector: 1/4-inch TRS; 1/4-inch TS; 3.5 mm TRS; DB-25 (analog trigger breakout); Multi-pin/proprietary harness; USB (trigger via USB peripheral); Other
fi: Triggerin syötön liitin: 1/4 tuuman TRS; 1/4 tuuman TS; 3,5 mm:n TRS; DB-25 (analoginen laukaisun jakoliitin); Moninapainen/valmistajakohtainen johtosarja; USB (laukaisu USB-lisälaitteen kautta); Muu
ja: トリガー入力コネクター: 1/4 インチ TRS; 1/4 インチ TS; 3.5 mm TRS; DB-25 (アナログトリガーブレイクアウト); マルチピン / 専用ハーネス; USB (USB 周辺機器経由のトリガー); その他
hr-HR: Konektor ulaza okidača: 1/4 inča TRS; 1/4 inča TS; 3,5 mm TRS; DB-25 (breakout kabel analognog okidača); Višepinski / vlasničko ožičenje; USB (okidač putem USB periferije); Ostalo
ko: 트리거 입력 커넥터: 1/4인치 TRS; 1/4인치 TS; 3.5mm TRS; DB-25(아날로그 트리거 브레이크아웃); 멀티 핀/독점 하니스; USB(USB 주변 기기를 통한 트리거); 기타
th: ขั้วต่ออินพุตทริกเกอร์: TRS 1/4 นิ้ว; TS 1/4 นิ้ว; TRS 3.5 มม.; DB-25 (ทริกเกอร์แอนะล็อกเบรกเอาท์); สายไฟหลายพิน/เฉพาะกิจ; USB (ทริกเกอร์ผ่านอุปกรณ์ต่อพ่วง USB); อื่นๆ
hu: Trigger-bemeneti csatlakozó: 1/4 colos TRS; 1/4 colos TS; 3,5 mm-es TRS; DB-25 (analóg trigger breakout); Többpólusú/egyedi kábelköteg; USB (triggerelés USB-periférián keresztül); Egyéb
ru: Разъем триггерного входа: TRS 1/4 дюйма; TS 1/4 дюйма; TRS 3,5 мм; DB-25 (аналоговый триггерный кабель-разветвитель); Многоконтактный/фирменный жгут проводов; USB (запуск через USB-периферию); Другое
fr: Connecteur d’entrée de trigger: TRS 1/4 po; TS 1/4 po; TRS 3,5 mm; DB-25 (épanouisseur de déclencheur analogique); Faisceau multibroche/propriétaire; USB (déclencheur via périphérique USB); Autre
es: Conector de entrada del activador: TRS de 1/4 pulg.; TS de 1/4 pulg.; TRS de 3,5 mm; DB-25 (salida de activador analógico); Arnés multipin/patentado; USB (activador mediante periférico USB); Otro